Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1233
Commissioner of Labor; enforcement powers.

(1) The Commissioner of Labor shall have the authority to subpoena records and witnesses related to the enforcement of the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act. The commissioner or his or her agent may inspect all related records and gather testimony on any matter relative to the enforcement of the act when the information sought is relevant to a lawful investigative purpose and is reasonable in scope.

(2) In case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, any court of competent jurisdiction, upon application by the commissioner, may issue to that person an order requiring such person to appear before the commissioner or the officer designated by the commissioner to produce documentary evidence if so ordered or to give evidence touching on the matter under investigation or in question. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of the court.

Laws 2014, LB560, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 17.
July 18, 2026